Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB966.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2203 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2203. Standards for restructuring of natural gas utility industry.The following interdependent standards shall govern the commission's actions in adopting rules, orders or policies and in reviewing, assessing and approving each natural gas distribution company's restructuring filings and overseeing the transition process and regulation of the restructured natural gas utility industry:123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *(3.1) The commission shall require, by order or regulation to be issued within 210 days of the effective date of this paragraph, that each natural gas distribution company shall account for any and all costs, including, but not limited to: commodity costs, capacity costs, hedging costs whether financial or physical, procurement costs, billing system and billing costs, customer service and account management costs, working capital, office building, rent and information technology costs, legal and financial costs and labor costs. To the extent any of these costs pay for services that support both distribution customers and supplier of last resort customers, the commission shall require an appropriate proportion of those costs be allocated to the supplier of last resort. In a case where costs are apportioned to both distribution customers and supplier of last resort customers, the apportionment shall be at actual costs. For the purpose of this paragraph, the provision of supplier of last resort service shall be treated as an affiliate of the natural gas distribution company. The intent of this requirement is to ensure that the actual costs of providing distribution and supplier of last resort service are accurately reflected in the rates charged for those services. The commission shall adopt rate mechanisms to ensure that the natural gas distribution companies recover fully their allowed distribution costs. The unbundling and reallocation shall be accomplished in the supplier of last resort's next rate case. If a natural gas distribution company does not file a rate case within three years following the effective date of this paragraph, the 20250SB0966PN1106 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission shall order the filing of information to effectuate unbundling and, after the filing, shall commence a proceeding where the unbundling is accomplished. After the initial allocation, changes may only be permitted in a general rate case. If the commission finds it necessary to do so, the commission shall establish a mandatory schedule for the filing of information and the unbundling proceedings required by this paragraph. * * *Section 2. Section 2206(b) of Title 66 is amended to read:§ 2206. Consumer protections and customer service.* * *(b) Change of suppliers.--(1) The commission shall, by order or regulation, establish procedures to ensure that a natural gas distribution company does not change a retail gas customer's natural gas supplier without direct oral confirmation from the customer of record or written evidence of the customer's consent to a change of supplier.(2) The commission shall promulgate regulations to ensure that a natural gas distribution company processes a change in natural gas supplier by using either the customer account number or other personally identifiable information. A customer who consents to a change of natural gas supplier shall not be required to provide a natural gas distribution company account number or other identification number if the customer provides a valid government-issued identification or alternative form of identification as determined by the commission. The commission shall consider whether a customer has multiple accounts.20250SB0966PN1106 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. Section 2208 of Title 66 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2208. Requirements for natural gas suppliers.* * *(i) Training program requirements for natural gas suppliers.--(1) The commission shall develop a training program for any entity or individual that is licensed by the commission under this section as a natural gas supplier. (2) The commission shall develop the program in consultation with interested stakeholders determined by the commission, which shall include the Office of Consumer Advocate and natural gas suppliers. (3) An individual working on behalf of a natural gas supplier and assisting customers engaging in change of suppliers as outlined under section 2206(b) (relating to consumer protections and customer service) shall demonstrate a thorough understanding of the commission's regulations regarding sales, consumer protection and any other matter the commission deems appropriate through an online training program.(4) At the conclusion of the program, the commission shall conduct an online examination and, on a satisfactory score, certify that the individual has successfully completed the program . (5) The commission shall determine the schedule and frequency by which an individual must complete the program and certification. The commission may not issue a license to a new natural gas supplier until an individual completes the 20250SB0966PN1106 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program and certification. (6) The commission may adopt regulations that include appropriate penalties or sanctions for failure to comply with this subsection.(7) The commission shall use the assessments collected in accordance with this part for the initial development of the training program. The commission may establish reasonable fees, as authorized under subsection (h), to fund the training program.Section 4. Section 2804 of Title 66 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2804. Standards for restructuring of electric industry.The following interdependent standards shall govern the commission's assessment and approval of each public utility's restructuring plan, oversight of the transition process and regulation of the restructured electric utility industry:* * *(3.1) The commission shall require, by order or regulation to be issued within 210 days of the effective date of this paragraph, that each electric distribution company account for any and all costs, including, but not limited to, commodity costs, capacity costs, hedging costs whether financial or physical, procurement costs, billing system and billing costs, customer service and account management costs, working capital, office building, rent and information technology costs, legal and financial costs and labor costs. To the extent any of these costs pay for services that support both distribution customers and supplier of last resort customers, the commission shall require an appropriate proportion of those costs be allocated to supplier of last 20250SB0966PN1106 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resort. For the purpose of this paragraph, the provision of supplier of last resort service shall be treated as an affiliate of the electric distribution company . The intent of this requirement is to ensure that the actual costs of providing distribution and supplier of last resort service are accurately reflected in the rates charged for those services. The commission shall adopt rate mechanisms to ensure that the electric distribution companies recover fully their allowed distribution costs. The unbundling and reallocation shall be accomplished in the supplier of last resort's next rate case. If an electric distribution company does not file a rate case within three years following the effective date of this paragraph, the commission shall order the filing of information to effectuate unbundling and, after the filing, shall commence a proceeding where the unbundling is accomplished. After the initial allocation, changes may only be permitted in a general rate case. If the commission finds it necessary to do so, the commission shall establish a mandatory schedule for the filing of information and the unbundling proceedings required by this paragraph.* * *Section 5. Sections 2807 and 2809 of Title 66 are amended by adding subsections to read:§ 2807. Duties of electric distribution companies.* * *(f.1) Processing changes in suppliers.--The commission shall promulgate regulations to ensure that an electric distribution company processes a change in electric generation supplier by using either the customer account number or other personally identifiable information. A customer who consents to a change of 20250SB0966PN1106 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electric generation supplier shall not be required to provide an electric distribution company account number or other identification number if the customer provides a valid government-issued or alternative form of identification as determined by the commission. The commission shall consider whether a customer has multiple accounts.* * *§ 2809. Requirements for electric generation suppliers.* * *(h) Training program requirements for electric generation suppliers.--(1) The commission shall develop a training program for any entity or individual that is licensed by the commission under this section as an electric generation supplier. (2) The commission shall develop the program in consultation with interested stakeholders determined by the commission, which shall include the Office of Consumer Advocate and electric generation suppliers. (3) An individual working on behalf of an electric generation supplier and assisting customers engaging in change of suppliers as outlined under section 2807(f.1) (relating to duties of electric distribution companies) shall demonstrate a thorough understanding of the commission's regulations regarding sales, consumer protection and any other matter the commission deems appropriate through an online training program.(4) At the conclusion of the program, the commission shall conduct an online examination and, on a satisfactory score, certify that the individual has successfully completed the program.20250SB0966PN1106 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The commission shall determine the schedule and frequency by which an individual must complete the program and certification. The commission may not issue a license to a new electric generation supplier until a designated representative of the new electric generation supplier completes the program and certification.(6) The commission may adopt regulations that include appropriate penalties or sanctions for failure to comply with this subsection.(7) The commission shall use the assessments collected in accordance with this part for the initial development of the training program. The commission may establish reasonable fees, as authorized under paragraph (g), to fund the training program.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB0966PN1106 - 8 - 123456789101112131415